Louisiana, session 2026, HB1211.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:4(A)(7) and 5(A)(22) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Sanitary Code
A. The state health officer acting through the office of public health of the
Louisiana Department of Health shall prepare, promulgate, and enforce rules and
regulations embodied within the state's Sanitary Code covering all matters within his
jurisdiction as defined and set forth in R.S. 40:5. The promulgation of this Sanitary
Code shall be accomplished in strict accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act and, further, in conformity with the following
guidelines and directives:
* * *
(7) The sanitary code shall provide rules and regulations for rural non-
congregate summer meal distribution sites that are not considered food service
establishments. These sites do not prepare meals onsite and only distribute pre-
packaged and shelf-stable meals.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2675 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1211
* * *
§5. General powers and jurisdiction
A. The state health officer and the office of public health of the Louisiana
Department of Health shall have exclusive jurisdiction, control, and authority:
* * *
(22) Over rural non-congregate summer meal distribution sites that do not
prepare meals onsite and only distribute pre-packaged and shelf stable meals and are
not considered food service establishments.
* * *